Di-198 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

NOTICE:

When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.

HINT:

e  Using SST 09843-18020, connect the terminals Tc and E1 of check connector.

. If any abnormality is not found when inspecting parts, inspect the ECU.

. If a malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed that code. For details
of each code, turn to the page referred to under the "See page” for respective "DTC No.” in the DTC

DI6X1-04

chart.
DTC chart of ABS:
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
C0278/ 11 N . .
Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
(DI-218) * ABS salenqidrelacwy
C0279/ 12 * ABS solenoid relay circuit
B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
(DI-218)
C0226/21 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-215) (SFRcircuit) * SFRR or SFRH circuit
C0236/22 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-215) (SFLcircuit) e SFLRor SFLH circuit
C0246/23 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-215) (SRRcircuit) * SRRR or SRRH circuit
C0256/24 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-215) (SRLcircuit) ¢ SRLRor SRLH circuit
C1225/25 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI1-233) (SAT circuit) * SA1 circuit
C1226/26 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI1-233) (SA2circuit) e SA2circuit
C1227/27 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster * Hydraulic brake booster
(D1-233) solenoid circuit (SA3 circuit) * SA3circuit
C1228/28 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(D1-233) (STRcircuit) * STRcircuit
1
C0200/31* Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction
i wi i uncti
(DI-208) 9 P g
1
C0205/32* . .
(DI-208) Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction « Right front, leftfront, right rear and left rear speed sensor
T « Each'speed'sensorcircuit -
C0210/33* . . .
Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Sensorrotor
(DI1-208)
1
C0215/34* Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction
wi i uncti
(DI-208) P g
C1235/35 . . ) .
Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the right front sensor
(D1-208) « Right front,left. front,ri.ghtrea. ,leftrea. sppedsensor
C1236/ 36 * Speed sensor rotor
Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the left front sensor
(DI1-208)
c1237/ 37 S tire is diff t size fi the other ti Tire si
me tir ren rom r tir r
(DI-247) ome tire is different size fro e other tires ire size
C1238/38 . . ) .
Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the right rear sensor
(D1-208) *Right front, left. front,ri.ghtrea. ,leftrea. sppedsensor
C1239/39 *» Speed sensor rotor
(DI-208) Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the left rear sensor
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* Batte
C1241/ 41 _ Y
(DI-248) Low battery voltage or abnormally high battery voltage *|C regulator
* Power source circuit
1242/ 425 " Battery
(DI-251) Open circuit in G2 circuit «IC regulator
» Power source circuit
C1243/ 43 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output) ) )
(DI-254) *Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1244 / 44 o . o ¢ Deceleration sensor
Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit ) o
(DI-258) » Deceleration sensor circuit
C1245/45 Malfunction in deceleration sensor " Deceleration sensor
unction i i
(DI-254) *Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1246/ 46 L . * Master cylinder pressure sensor
Malfunction in master cylinder pressure sensor ) —
(DI-261) * Master cylinder pressure sensor circuit
C1249/49 A . . Lo . . Lo
(DI-264) Open circuit in stop light switch circuit Stop light switch circuit
2
C1251/51* | Pump motor is locked Hvdraulic brake booster BUMD MGtor
uli u
(D1-268) Open circuit in pump motor ground y pump
C1252) 52*2 * Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
(DI-271) Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction * Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
* Pressure switch (PH or PL)
C1253/ 53*2 * ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2 relay
(DI-277) Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction * ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2 relay circuit
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
2
C1254 | 54* . . * Pressure switch (PH or PL)
Pressure switch malfunction . L
(D1-282) * Pressure switch circuit
C1256 56*2 e Accumulator
(DI-285) Accumulator low pressure malfunction * Pressure switch (PH or PL)
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
C1257 / 57+ " Battery
(DI-291) Power supply drive circuit malfunction * Power source circuit
« Skid control ECU
C1203 /59 * TRC+ or TRC- circuit
(DI-225) Engine and ECT ECU communication circuit malfunction *ENG+ or ENG- circuit
¢ Engine and ECT ECU
C1268/68 . . L . * Transfer L4 position switch
Transfer L4 position signal transmission failure o . o
(D1-294) « Transfer L4 position switch circuit
* Battery
Always ON Malfunction in skid control ECU * ICregulator
ion i i
(DI-307) . e Power source circuit
« Skid control ECU

*: Asthe DTC cannotbe erased by replacing parts alone do either of the following operations.
Clear DTC (See page DI-185).
At the vehicle speed of 20 km/h (12 mph), drive the vehicle for 30 sec. or more.
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DI-200 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

2
* :Usingthefollowing table, troubled parts can be specified.

DTC 42 51 52 53 54 56 57
BRAKE Warning ||ght andbuzzer Light Buzzer LightBuzzer| LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LighBuzzer|
O O O 0 O
Pressure switch PH
PL O U O U U
Pump motor bpu gt 0|y
Pump motor circuit MTT wire harness
MT+ wire harness 0
MT- wire harness 0
Accumulator malfunction O|D
MR1 open circuit U
o MR2 open circuit -
Motor relay circuit 01l o 0
MR1 welded contact
MR2 welded contact Y -
Hydraulicbrake booster| Pressureleaks o (o oo
Power source* IG2 open circuit O
ECU Power supply circuit 0

*: When IG1 circuit is open, ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come on.
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DI-201

DTC chart of VSC:
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
C1231 /31 L . « Steering angle sensor
Malfunction in steering angle sensor . —
(D1-236) « Steering angle sensor circuit
C1232/32 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor . N
(D1-241) * Deceleration sensor circuit
C1233/33 Open or short circuit in yaw rate sensor circuit " Yawrate sensor
ircuit in yaw ircui
(D1-244) P ! 4 !  Yawrate sensor circuit
C1234 /34 L *Yawrate sensor
Malfunction in yaw rate sensor .
(D1-244)  Yaw rate sensor circuit
C1335/35 L . L o « Steering angle sensor
Malfunction in steering angle sensor communication circuit . L
(DI1-236) « Steering angle sensor circuit
* Yawrate sensor
C1210/36 o W o
Zero point calibration of yaw rate sensor undone * Yaw rate sensor circuit
(DI-300) . -
« Neutral start switch circuit (P range)
* Decelerationsensor
C1336/39 ) N ) I .
Zero point calibration of deceleration sensor * Deceleration sensor circuit
(DI-300) . .
« Neutral start switch (P range) circuit
C1289/ 41* .
Malfunction in VGRS control system VGRS control system
(DI1-230)
C1223/43 Malfunction in ABS control syst ABS control syst
alfunction in control system control system
(DI-230) 4 4
*NEO circuit
C1224/44 o o Ociroui
(DI-231) Open or short circuit in NE signal circuit *Engineand ECTECU
« Skid control ECU
C1340/ 47 o ireult ter diff ial lock sianal « Center differential lock system
en circuit in center differential lock signal
(DI-303) P reurt ! I 9 « Center differential lock circuit
C1291 / 48* . o . *VSC+orVSC - c.ircu.it
(DI-225) VGRS ECU communication circuit malfunction *AFS+orAFS - circuit
*EngineandECTECU
C1201 / 51 . . .
(DI-224) Engine and ECT ECU system malfunction Engine control system
*TRC+orTRC - circuit
C1203/53 ) o . j I .UI .
(DI-225) Engineand ECT ECU communication circuit malfunction *ENG+0rENG - circuit
*Engineand ECTECU
Always ON Malfunction in skid control ECU * Power source circuit
(DI-310) Opencircuitin VSC TRC warning light circuit *VSC TRC warning lightcircuit

*: w/ VGRS only

HINT:

Thereisacasethathand
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—heldtester cannotbe used when VSC TRC warning lightis always on.




